Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1 Time-Share Act of 1981
66-32-121. Powers and duties of commission.

The commission may adopt, amend, and repeal rules, regulations and issue orders consistent with, and in furtherance of the objectives of this part.

The commission may prescribe forms and procedures for submitting information to the commission.

The commission may accept grants-in-aid from any governmental source and may contract with agencies charged with similar functions in this or other jurisdictions, in furtherance of the objectives of this part.

The commission may cooperate with agencies performing similar functions in this and other jurisdictions to develop uniform filing procedures and forms, uniform disclosure standards, and uniform administrative practices, and may develop information that may be useful in the discharge of the commission's duties.

The commission may initiate private investigations within or outside this state.

The commission shall have the power to revoke, or suspend the real estate license of a sales agent, or the registration of a time-share project, or to otherwise appropriately discipline the sales agent, or fine the developer pursuant to § 56-1-308, if, after notice and hearing, any of the following conditions exist:

Any representation in any document or information filed with the commission is false or misleading; or

Any developer or agent of a developer has:

Engaged in or is engaging in any unlawful act or practice;

Disseminated or caused to be disseminated orally, or in writing, any false or misleading promotional materials in connection with a time-share program;

Concealed, diverted, or disposed of any funds or assets of any person in a manner impairing rights of purchasers of time-share intervals in the time-share program;

Failed to perform any stipulation or agreement made to induce the commission to issue an order relating to that time-share program;

Otherwise violated this part or the commission's rules, regulations, or orders;

Makes any willful or negligent misrepresentation, or any willful or negligent omission of material fact about any time-share or time-share project, or exchange program;

Makes any false promises of a character likely to influence, persuade or induce;

Engages in any other conduct which constitutes improper, fraudulent or dishonest dealing; or

Fails to promptly account for any funds held in trust, or who fails to display all records, books and accounts of such funds to the commission upon demand as provided for in this part, and the rules and regulations.

The commission may issue a cease and desist order if the developer has not registered the time-share program as required by this part.

The commission, after notice and hearing, may issue an order revoking the registration of a time-share program upon determination that a developer or an agent of a developer has failed to comply with a notice of suspension issued by the commission affecting the time-share program.

The commission may reject an application for registration if the commission finds that:

The developer or any entity or individual which composes the developer, or any officer or director of the developer does not possess a history of honesty, truthfulness, and fair dealing. Factors to be used in making such determination shall include whether the developer or any entity or individual which composes the developer, or any officer or director of the developer has:

Been convicted of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to, any crime involving an act of fraud or dishonesty;

Consented to or suffered a judgment in any civil or administrative action based upon conduct involving an act of fraud or dishonesty;

Consented to or suffered the suspension or revocation of any professional, occupational, or vocational license based upon conduct involving an act of fraud or dishonesty;

Knowingly made or caused to be made in any application or report filed with the commission, or in any proceeding before the commission, any written or oral statement which was at the time, and in light of the circumstances under which it was made, false or misleading with respect to material fact;

Willfully omitted a material fact with respect to information furnished or requested in connection with an application;

Willfully committed any violation of, or has willfully aided, abetted, counseled, commanded, induced, or procured the violation by any other person, of any provision of state law or rule; or

Been involved in unlicensed activity; or

The commission may reject an application for registration if the commission finds that the developer or any entity or individual which composes the developer, or any officer or director of the developer does not possess a history of financial integrity. Factors to be used in making such determination shall include whether the developer or any entity or individual which composes the developer, or any officer or director of the developer:

Has been placed in receivership or conservatorship during the previous ten (10) years;

Has filed for bankruptcy within the previous ten (10) years; or

Is liable for amounts of debt which would create excessive risks of default.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 22; T.C.A., § 64-3222; Acts 1985, ch. 98, §§ 5, 6; 1988, ch. 482, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

66-32-122. Registration — Bond — Statement of exchange agent.

Unless exempted by § 66-32-126, a developer may not offer or dispose of a time-share interval unless the time-share program is registered with the commission; provided, that a developer may accept a reservation together with a deposit if the deposit is placed in an escrow account with an institution having trust powers and is refundable at any time at the purchaser's option. In all cases, a reservation must require a subsequent affirmative act by the purchaser via a separate instrument to create a binding obligation. A developer may not dispose of or transfer a time-share interval while an order revoking or suspending the registration of the time-share program is in effect.

The acquisition agent shall be required to furnish to the commission its principal office address and telephone number and designate its responsible managing employee and shall furnish such additional information as the commission may require.

The sales agent shall, in addition to other requirements of law, be required to furnish to the commission its principal office address and telephone number and designate its responsible managing employee and shall furnish such additional information as the commission may require.

The managing agent shall be required to furnish to the commission its principal office address and telephone number and designate its responsible managing employee and shall furnish such additional information as the commission may require. Such additional information shall include criminal convictions.

An exchange agent, including the developer if it is also the exchange agent, if offering exchange privileges with other time-share interval owners of time-share interval owners who own time-share estates within this state, shall annually file a statement with the commission which must fully and accurately disclose:

The identity of the person operating the exchange program and whether that person is an affiliate of the developer;

A general description of the procedures to qualify for and effectuate exchanges, including any stated or practiced priorities and restrictions, and the extent to which changes thereof may be made;

The expenses, or ranges of expenses, to the time-share interval owners of membership in the exchange program including the expenses, if any, and the person to whom those expenses are payable;

Whether and how any of the expenses specified in subdivision (e)(3) may be altered and, if any of them are to be fixed on a case-by-case basis, the manner in which they are to be fixed in each case;

With respect to the owners of time-share intervals in the exchange program at each project during a calendar year ending not more than fifteen (15) months before the statement is filed;

The percentage of exchanges properly applied for by members or participants in the exchange program that were fulfilled during a calendar year ending not more than fifteen (15) months before the date the statement is filed with the commission, together with a statement of the criteria used to determine whether an exchange was properly applied for and fulfilled; and

The number of persons applying for an exchange program as a whole during the calendar year ending not more than fifteen (15) months before the statement is filed with the commission.

The developer must provide a copy of the most recent exchange agent's statement filed with the commission to the purchaser in addition to the public offering statement if it is represented to the purchaser that the purchaser is entitled to or required to become a member of the exchange program. The developer is not responsible to the purchaser for any representation made in the exchange agent's statement which is untrue or incorrect.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 23; T.C.A., § 64-3223; Acts 1983, ch. 210, § 6; 1989, ch. 65, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Time-share plans in existence before May 19, 1981, were required to be filed with the commissioner within 60 days of that date.

66-32-123. Application and fees for registration.

An application for registration must contain the public offering statement, a brief description of the property, copies of time-share instruments and any documents referred to therein other than tract maps, plats, plans, and such other information required by the commission's rules and regulations and be accompanied by any reasonable fees required by the commission.

Fee for registration of time-share interval plans; expenses for investigation and prosecution:

For the registration of all time-share interval plans and the accommodations and facilities affected thereby which are located within the state, there shall be paid to the commission the sum of one hundred dollars ($100), together with an annual renewal fee of fifty dollars ($50.00);

For the registration of all time-share interval plans and the accommodations and facilities affected thereby which are located outside the state, there shall be paid to the commission the sum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), together with an annual renewal fee of one hundred dollars ($100); and

Notwithstanding subdivisions (b)(1) and (2), the fees charged and collected shall be sufficient to cover the cost of administering this part.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 24; T.C.A., § 64-3224.

66-32-124. Commission regulation of public offering statement.

The commission at any time may require a developer to alter or supplement the form or substance of a public offering statement to assure adequate and accurate disclosure to prospective purchasers.

The public offering statement may not be used for any promotional purposes before registration and afterwards only if it is used in its entirety. No person may advertise or represent that the commission has approved or recommended the time-share program, the disclosure statement, or any of the documents contained in the application for registration.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 25; T.C.A., § 64-3225.

66-32-125. Effective date of registration — Incomplete or inadequate application.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the effective date of the registration, or any amendment thereto, shall be the forty-fifth day after the filing thereof or such earlier date as the commission may determine, having due regard to the public interest and the protection of purchasers. If any amendment to any such registration is filed prior to the effective date, the registration shall be deemed to have been filed when such amendment was filed.

If it appears to the commission that the application for registration, or any amendment thereto, is on its face incomplete or inaccurate in any material respect, the commission shall so advise the developer prior to the date the registration would otherwise be effective. Such notification shall serve to suspend the effective date of the filing until the forty-fifth day after the developer files such additional information as the commission shall require. Any developer, upon receipt of such notice of suspension, may request a hearing.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 26; T.C.A., § 64-3226.

66-32-126. Exceptions from registration requirement.

No registration with the commission shall be required in the case of:

Any transfer of a time-share interval by any time-share interval owner other than the developer and/or the developer's agent;

Any disposition pursuant to court order;

A disposition by a government or governmental agency;

A disposition by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure;

A disposition of a time-share interval in a time-share project situated wholly outside this state; provided, that all solicitations, negotiations, and contacts took place wholly outside this state and the contract was executed wholly outside this state;

A gratuitous transfer of a time-share interval; or

Group reservations made for fifteen (15) or more people as a single transaction between a hotel and travel agent or travel groups for hotel accommodations, where deposits are made and held for more than three (3) years in advance.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 27; T.C.A., § 64-3227.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

66-32-127. Financing of time-share programs.

In the financing of a time-share program, the developer shall retain financial records of the schedule of payments required to be made and the payments made to any person or entity which is the owner of an underlying blanket mortgage, deed of trust, contract of sale or other lien or encumbrance (lienhold).

Any transfer of the developer's interest in the time-share program to any third person shall be subject to the obligations of the developer.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 28; T.C.A., § 64-3228.

66-32-128. Protection of nondefaulting purchasers.

The developer whose project is subject to an underlying blanket lien or encumbrance shall protect nondefaulting purchasers from foreclosure by the lienholder by obtaining from the lienholder a nondisturbance clause, subordination agreement or partial release of the lien as the time-share intervals are sold. In the alternative, the developer may obtain the agreement of the lienholder to take the project, in the event of default by the developer, subject to the rights of the nondefaulting purchasers by posting a bond, equal to fifty percent (50%) of the amount owed to the lienholder, making an assignment of receivables equal to one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the principal amounts due to the lienholder, pledging collateral security equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount owed to the lienholder or entering into any other financing plan or escrow agreement acceptable to the lienholder.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 29; T.C.A., § 64-3229.

66-32-129. Protection of lienholder.

The lienholder in any time-share program shall have the following rights:

A lienholder's lien rights shall be preserved as against any purchaser of time-share interval claiming that the time-share is invalid, void or voidable, thirty (30) days after written notice by certified mail or personal delivery has been given by the developer to the purchaser. Such notice must state the developer has assigned the receivables to the lienholder and that purchaser has thirty (30) days within which to object and specify the invalidity or defect contained within such instrument.

Any purchaser who fails to indicate the invalidity, void or voidableness as provided in subdivision (1) waives or is estopped to raise, the same in any subsequent enforcement of the collection of the receivable by the lienholder.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 30; T.C.A., § 64-3230.

66-32-130. Premiere tourist resort city.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part, a “premiere tourist resort city” defined as a municipality having a population of three thousand (3,000) or more persons, according to the federal census of 1980 or any subsequent federal census in which at least forty percent (40%) of the assessed valuation, as shown by the tax assessment rolls or books of the municipality, of real estate in the municipality consists of hotels, motels, tourist court accommodations, tourist shops and restaurants, is hereby authorized to adopt by its board of commissioners any ordinance necessary to regulate the sale and use of time-share units within its jurisdiction including the requirement of registration, licenses, transfer and related requirements including any related fees.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 34; T.C.A., § 64-3231.

Compiler's Notes. For table of population of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

66-32-131. Misleading advertising unlawful.

It is unlawful for any person with intent directly or indirectly to offer for sale or sell time-share intervals in this state to authorize, use, direct or aid in the publication, distribution or circulation of any advertisement, radio broadcast or telecast concerning the time-share project in which the time-share intervals are offered, which contains any statement, pictorial representation or sketch which is false or misleading. Nothing in this section shall be construed to hold the publisher or employee of any newspaper, or any job printer, or any broadcaster or telecaster, or any magazine publisher, or any of the employees thereof, liable for any publication referred to in this section unless the publisher, employee, or printer has actual knowledge of the falsity thereof or has an interest either as an owner or agent in the time-share intervals so advertised.

Acts 1983, ch. 210, § 7.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of Time-Sharing and the Tennessee Time-Share Act: Are Purchasers Now Protected?, 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 779 (1986).

66-32-132. Advertising — Specific prohibitions.

No advertising for the offer or sale of time-share intervals shall:

Contain any representation as to the availability of a resale program or rental program offered by or on behalf of the developer or its affiliate unless the resale program and/or rental program has been made a part of the offering and submitted to the commission;

Contain an offer or inducement to purchase which purports to be limited as to quantity or restricted as to time unless the numerical quantity and/or time applicable to the offer or inducement is clearly and conspicuously disclosed;

Contain any statement concerning the investment merit or profit potential of the time-share interval unless the commission has determined from evidence submitted on behalf of the developer that the representation is neither false nor misleading;

Make a prediction of or imply specific or immediate increases in the price or value of the time-share intervals; nor shall a price increase of a time-share interval be announced more than sixty (60) days prior to the date that the increase will be placed into effect;

Contain statements concerning the availability of time-share intervals at a particular minimum price if the number of time-share intervals available at that price comprises less than ten percent (10%) of the unsold inventory of the developer, unless the number of time-share intervals then for sale at the minimum price is set forth in the advertisement;

Contain any statement that the time-share interval being offered for sale can be further divided unless a full disclosure is included as to the legal requirements for further division of the time-share interval;

Contain any asterisk or other reference symbol as a means of contradicting or changing the ordinary meaning of any previously made statement in the advertisement;

Misrepresent the size, nature, extent, qualities, or characteristics of the accommodations or facilities which comprise the time-share project;

Misrepresent the nature or extent of any services incident to the time-share project;

Misrepresent or imply that a facility or service is available for the exclusive use of purchasers or owners if a public right of access or of use of the facility or service exists;

Make any misleading or deceptive representation with respect to the contents of the time-share program, the purchase contract, the purchaser's rights, privileges, benefits or obligations under the purchase contract or this part;

Misrepresent the conditions under which a purchaser or owner may participate in an exchange program; or

Describe any proposed or uncompleted private facilities over which the developer has no control unless the estimated date of completion is set forth and evidence has been presented to the commission that the completion and operation of the facilities are reasonably assured within the time represented in the advertisement.

Acts 1983, ch. 210, § 8.

66-32-133. Prize or gift promotional offers — Unlawful acts.

The following unfair acts or practices undertaken by, or omissions of, any person in the operation of any prize or gift promotional offer, by any means, including, but not limited to, by mail, by telephone, by advertisement or in person, for a time-share project are prohibited:

Failing to clearly and conspicuously state the name and street address of the person making the offer;

Representing or leading a person to believe that the person is or could be a winner if the person has not won or is not eligible to win;

Representing or leading a person to believe that the person has been “selected” or is otherwise part of a select or special group when the person has not been selected or is not part of a select or special group;

Representing that a person has won or could win a prize, or will receive a gift, or thing of value or has been selected, or is eligible, to win a prize, or receive a gift, or thing of value if the receipt of the prize, or gift, or thing of value is conditioned upon the person listening to or observing a sales promotional effort, making a purchase, or incurring any monetary obligation unless it is clearly and conspicuously disclosed, at the time of the initial offer, contact, or notification of the prize or gift, or thing of value that an attempt will be made to induce the consumer or person to incur a monetary obligation, including the amount of any monetary obligation;

Failing to clearly and conspicuously disclose next to each prize, gift, or thing of value offered or any product offered for sale through the promotional plan the item's approximate verifiable retail value, which means the price at which the person offering the item can substantiate that a substantial number of these items have been sold at retail by another person or, in the event such substantiation is unavailable, nor more than three (3) times the amount actually paid by the sponsor or promoter for the item;

Representing that the prize, gift, or thing of value offered or any product offered for sale through the promotional plan possesses particular features or benefits, if it does not, or is of a particular standard, quality, grade, or model, if it is of another;

Failing to clearly and conspicuously disclose next to each prize, gift, or thing of value offered, a statement of odds, if applicable, in Arabic numerals, of receiving each item offered, and a statement, if applicable, that those offers are not exclusive to the above-named person and whether all prizes or gifts will be awarded;

Making the receipt of an offered prize or gift contingent upon the consent of individual winners or recipients to allow their names to be used for promotional purposes, or failing to obtain the express written or oral consent of individual winners or recipients before their names are used for a promotional purpose in connection with the mailing to a third person;

Refusing to disclose or make available, upon request, the names of the recipients of any prizes or gifts within the geographic area wherein the promotional offers were made;

Failing to clearly and conspicuously disclose in any initial offer, at a minimum, the following:

A general description of the types and categories of any restrictions, qualifications, or other conditions, that must be satisfied before the person is entitled to receive or use the prize, gift, or thing of value or product or service offered;

The approximate total of all costs, fees, or other monetary obligations that must be satisfied before the consumer or person is entitled to receive or use the prize, gift, or thing of value or product or service offered; and

That the details and an explanation of all restrictions, qualifications or other conditions of the offer shall be provided prior to the acceptance of the offer; or

Failing to clearly and conspicuously state verbally, or upon request, in writing, before an offer can be accepted all restrictions, qualifications, monetary obligations, and other conditions that must be satisfied before the person is entitled to receive or use the prize, gift, or thing of value or product or service offered, including:

Any deadline by which the recipient must visit the business, attend or listen to a sales presentation or otherwise respond in order to receive the prize, gift, or thing of value or product or service offered;

The date or dates on or before which the prize, gift or thing of value, product or service offered will terminate or expire and, if applicable, when the prizes will be awarded;

The approximate duration of any mandatory sales presentation or tour, if applicable;

Any other conditions, such as a minimum or maximum age qualification, any financial qualification, or requirement that, if the recipient is married, both spouses must be present or respond in order to receive the prize, gift or thing of value or product or service offered; and

All other material rules, terms, restrictions, and conditions of the offer or promotional program including, but not limited to, any promotional service, handling, shipping, delivery, freight, postage or processing fees, charges, or other extra costs for the receipt or use of the prize, gift, or thing of value or product or service offered; provided that the requirements of this subdivision (10)(B)(v) shall not be construed to require that foreign tax rates be included;

Misrepresenting in any manner the rules, terms, restrictions, monetary obligation, or conditions of participation in the promotional plan or offer;

Failing to award and distribute the prize, gift, or thing of value or product or service offered in accordance with the rules, terms, and conditions of the offer or promotional program as stated or disclosed in accordance with subdivisions (1)-(11); and

Failing to award and distribute at least one (1) of each prize or gift of the value and type represented in the promotional program by the day and year specified in the promotion. When a promotion promises the award of a prescribed number of each prize, such number of prizes shall be awarded by the date and year specified in the promotion. For purposes of this subdivision (13)(A), distribution of cash shall be equivalent to distribution of a gift or prize, and a qualified recipient shall be allowed to choose either the gift or prize or cash in an amount equal to the cost of the gift or prize only if the gift or prize is not delivered to a qualified recipient within seventy-two (72) hours of the time the recipient would have been entitled to the gift or prize.

Such choice shall be disclosed to the recipient at the time of the initial offering.

Acts 1983, ch. 210, § 9; 1991, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 84, § 1; 1993, ch. 230, § 1.

66-32-134. Violation of §§ 66-32-131 — 66-32-133.

Whenever the commission determines from evidence available to it that a person is violating or failing to comply with the requirements of §§66-32-131 —66-32-133, the commission may order the person to cease and desist from such violations and may take enforcement action under §§66-32-121 —66-32-126.

Acts 1983, ch. 210, § 10.

66-32-135. Construction of §§ 66-32-131 — 66-32-133 with Tennessee Consumer Protection Act.

Sections66-32-131 —66-32-133 shall be in addition to those provisions in the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act, compiled in title 47, chapter 18; provided, that to the extent that any provisions of the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act are in conflict with §§66-32-131 —66-32-133, the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act shall control.

Acts 1983, ch. 210, § 11.

66-32-136. Advertising material — Engaging time-share resale broker in connection with resale of time-share interval.

Any advertising material relating to the solicitation of an agreement engaging the services of a time-share resale broker in connection with the resale of a time-share interval pursuant to § 66-32-137(b) is subject to the provisions of §§ 66-32-131 — 66-32-135.

“Advertising material” includes any oral or written sales pitch, promotional brochure, pamphlet, catalogue, advertisement, sign, billboard or other material to be disseminated to the public by any means relating to the solicitation of an agreement engaging the services of a time-share resale broker in connection with the resale of a time-share interval, pursuant to § 66-32-137(b), including a transcript of any standard oral sales presentation or any radio or television advertisement.

No written advertising material relating to the solicitation of an agreement engaging the services of a time-share resale broker in connection with the resale of a time-share interval, pursuant to § 66-32-137(b), may be utilized by a time-share resale broker unless the advertising material includes in conspicuous type the disclosure described in § 66-32-137(b)(1).

The commission has authority to enforce this section as provided in §§ 66-32-121 and 62-13-109.

Acts 1990, ch. 672, §§ 3, 5.

66-32-137. Violations — Required contents of written agreements engaging the services of a resale broker and contracts for purchase and sale.

It is a violation of this part for any time-share resale broker to:

Enter into any agreement with any person engaging the services of the time-share resale broker in connection with the resale of a time-share interval unless a written agreement complying in all respects with subsection (b) is first executed by the time-share resale broker and the person engaging the services of the time-share resale broker;

Accept any moneys or any other thing of value from any person engaging the services of the time-share resale broker in connection with the resale of a time-share interval in advance of the closing of the resale of such time-share interval; or

Utilize any form of contract or purchase and sale agreement in connection with the resale of a time-share interval unless the contract or purchase and sale agreement complies in all respects with subsection (d).

In addition to all requirements of and obligations under the Tennessee Real Estate Broker License Act of 1973, compiled in title 62, chapter 13, all agreements engaging the services of a time-share resale broker in connection with the resale of a time-share interval shall contain all of the following:

The following statement in conspicuous type located immediately prior to the space in the agreement reserved for the signature of the owner:

THERE IS NO GUARANTEE THAT YOUR TIME-SHARE INTERVAL CAN BE SOLD AT ANY PARTICULAR PRICE OR WITHIN ANY PARTICULAR PERIOD OF TIME;

A complete and clear disclosure of any fees, commissions, and other costs or compensation payable to or received by the time-share resale broker under the agreement, whether directly or indirectly;

The term of the agreement, a statement regarding the ability of any party to extend the term of the agreement, and a description of the conditions under which the agreement may be extended and all related costs;

A description of the services to be provided by the time-share resale broker under the agreement, and a description of the obligations of each party regarding a resale purchaser, including any costs to be borne and any obligations regarding notification of the managing entity and any exchange company;

A statement disclosing whether the agreement grants exclusive rights to the time-share resale broker to locate a purchaser during the term of the agreement, a statement disclosing to whom and when any proceeds from a sale of the time-share interval will be disbursed, and a statement whether any party may terminate the agreement and under what conditions;

A statement disclosing whether the agreement permits the time-share resale broker or any other person to make any use whatsoever of the time-share interval in question and a detailed description of any such permitted use rights, including a disclosure of to whom any rents or profits generated from such use of the time-share interval will be paid; and

A statement disclosing the existence of any judgments or orders against the time-share resale broker resulting from a violation by the time-share resale broker of this part, the Tennessee Real Estate Broker License Act of 1973, or the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act of 1977, compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 1, or resulting from consumer fraud on the part of the time-share resale broker.

The person engaging the services of the time-share resale broker must receive a fully executed copy of the agreement described in subsection (b) on the day such person signs it.

All forms of contract or purchase and sale agreement utilized by a time-share resale broker in connection with the sale of a time-share interval shall contain all of the following:

An explanation of the form of time-share ownership being purchased and a legally sufficient description of the time-share interval being purchased;

The name and address of the managing entity of the time-share plan;

The following statement in conspicuous type located immediately prior to the space in the contract reserved for the signature of the purchaser:

THE CURRENT YEAR'S ASSESSMENT FOR COMMON EXPENSES ALLOCABLE TO THE TIME-SHARE INTERVAL YOU ARE PURCHASING IS $ . THIS ASSESSMENT, WHICH MAY BE INCREASED FROM TIME TO TIME BY [insert name of entity having authority to increase assessment], IS PAYABLE IN FULL ON OR BEFORE [state payment due date(s)]. THIS ASSESSMENT [INCLUDES/DOES NOT INCLUDE] YEARLY AD VALOREM REAL ESTATE TAXES. [If ad valorem real property taxes are not included in the current year's assessment for common expenses, the following statement must be included: THE MOST RECENT ANNUAL ASSESSMENT FOR AD VALOREM REAL ESTATE TAXES FOR THE TIME-SHARE INTERVAL YOU ARE PURCHASING IS $ ]. FAILURE TO TIMELY PAY THESE ASSESSMENTS MAY RESULT IN RESTRICTION OR LOSS OF YOUR USE AND/OR OWNERSHIP RIGHTS.

In making the disclosures required by this subdivision (d)(3), the time-share resale broker may rely upon information provided in writing by the managing entity of the time-share project;

A complete and accurate disclosure of the terms and conditions of the purchase and closing, including the obligations of the seller and/or the purchaser for closing costs and title insurance;

A statement disclosing the existence of any mandatory exchange program membership included in the time-share project; and

In lieu of subdivisions (d)(1)-(5), a time-share resale broker affiliated with a time-share developer may use the public offering statement and sales contract to consummate a resale; provided, that such information includes the substance of all of subdivisions (d)(1)-(5).

The commission has authority to enforce this section as provided in §§ 66-32-121 and 62-13-109.

Acts 1990, ch. 672, §§ 4, 5.

66-32-138. Delivery of required renewal documentation and fees.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all documentation and fees which are a prerequisite to the renewal of a license or registration shall be delivered to the commission no later than sixty (60) days prior to the expiration date of the license or registration.

Acts 2000, ch. 861, § 1.

66-32-139. Registration of acquisition agents — Penalties for prohibited activity and conduct — Commission's authority to promulgate rules and regulations.

All acquisition agents and their representatives, as defined in § 66-32-102, shall register with the commission and furnish such information as provided by commission regulation. The application for registration shall be accompanied by a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) registration fee.

The commission has the authority to assess civil penalties, or to suspend or revoke the registration of an acquisition agent, for any activity or conduct in violation of § 62-13-312 or § 66-32-121. The commission also has the authority to promulgate rules and guidelines for the training and conduct of acquisition agents.

Acts 2000, ch. 861, § 3.